Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 4A Department of Juvenile Justice
49-4A-13.
Family attention home; assessment of risk and plan of care.

As used in this Code section, the term “family attention home” means a private family home that has contracted with the Department of Juvenile Justice to provide 24 hour, short-term care for youth in the custody of the department and placed by the department in the home.
Said youth are either awaiting a juvenile court hearing or have been temporarily removed from their homes for other reasons. Prior to a youth being placed in a private family attention home, an assessment of the youth’s risk to the public will be completed by the department, and based on that assessment a plan of care for each youth will be developed within 72 hours after placement. This plan shall detail the youth’s need for adult supervision, the youth’s need for structured after-school activities, the need for electronic monitoring, if appropriate, and any other additional treatment needs while the youth is in the home. This plan of care shall be developed and implemented to ensure the safety of the children and youth in each private family attention home and the residents of the communities in which the private family attention homes are located.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 495, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1.

49-4A-14.
Compensation for damage to apparel by youth under custody.

As used in this Code section, the term “apparel” includes eyeglasses, hearing aids, clothing, and similar items worn on the person of the employee.

When action by a youth under the control and custody of the department results in damage to an item of apparel, the department shall compensate the employee for the loss in the amount of either the repair cost, the replacement value, or the actual cost of the item of wearing apparel, whichever is less. Such loss shall be compensated only in accordance with procedures to be established by the department, and no compensation shall be made by the department in excess of $500.00 per incident.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 563, § 1.

49-4A-15.
Guard lines.

Guard lines shall be established by the commissioner or his or her designated representative in charge at the various juvenile detention centers and youth development centers in the same manner that land lines are established, except that, at each corner of the lines, signs must be used on which shall be plainly stamped or written: “Guard line of
_______________ .” Signs shall also be placed at all entrances and exits for vehicles and pedestrians at the institutions and at such intervals along the guard lines as will reasonably place all persons approaching the guard lines on notice of the location of the institutions.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 2/SB 366.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 3/SB 366, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

49-4A-16.
Unlawful crossing or passage of certain items across guard lines; penalty.

As used in this Code section, the term “guard lines” means the lines established pursuant to Code Section 49-4A-15.

It shall be unlawful for any person to cause to be introduced across guard lines or to come inside such guard lines with:

A gun, pistol, knife, or any other weapon or a bullet, ammunition, or explosive device; or

Any intoxicating liquor, amphetamines, marijuana, or any other hallucinogenic or other drugs.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply when the commissioner or director of the juvenile detention facility has provided authorization for the introduction of the items listed in subsection (b) of this Code section into such facility.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than four years.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 2/SB 366; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-12/HB 242.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012. See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, in subsection (c), substituted “detention facility” for “detention center or youth development center” near the middle, and substituted “facility” for “center” at the end. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 3/SB 366, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-4A-17.
Introduction of certain items into juvenile detention facility prohibited; commerce with incarcerated youth.

Without the knowledge and consent of the commissioner or the director in charge of any juvenile detention facility, it shall be unlawful for any person to take into or cause to be introduced into such facility any item which such person has been directed not to take into such center:

Verbally by a staff member of such facility;

In writing by a staff member of such facility; or

As directed by the rules, regulations, or policies of such facility.

Any item taken into a facility in violation of this subsection shall be deemed contraband and shall be subject to being confiscated and retained as property of the department.

Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than four years.

It shall be unlawful for any person to trade or traffic with, buy from, or sell any article to a child assigned to a juvenile detention facility without the knowledge and consent of the commissioner or the director in charge of such facility. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than four years.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 2/SB 366; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-13/HB 242.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012. See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “facility” for “center” throughout this Code section; substituted “detention facility” for “detention center or youth development center” in paragraph (a)(1) and subsection (b); and, in subsection (b), substituted “child” for “youth” in the first sentence. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 3/SB 366, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-4A-18.
Prohibited possession of certain goods by youth.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Director” means the commissioner or any director of a juvenile detention center or his or her designee, or any other person who is responsible for the overall management and operation of a center.

“Juvenile detention center” means a regional youth detention center or youth development center operated by or on behalf of the department.

“Telecommunications device” means a device, an apparatus associated with a device, or a component of a device that enables, or may be used to enable, communication with a person outside a place of incarceration, including, but not limited to, a telephone, cellular telephone, personal digital assistant, transmitting radio, or computer connected or capable of being connected to a computer network, by wireless or other technology, or otherwise capable of communicating with a person or device outside of a place of incarceration.

“Youth” means an offender assigned to a juvenile detention center.

Without the authorization of the director, it shall be unlawful for any person to obtain for, to procure for, or to give to a youth a gun, pistol, knife, or any other weapon; a bullet, ammunition, or any other explosive device; tobacco products; intoxicating liquor; marijuana, amphetamines, or any other hallucinogenic drugs or other drugs, regardless of the amount; any telecommunications device; or any other article or item.

Without the authorization of the director, it shall be unlawful for a youth to possess a gun, pistol, knife, or any other weapon; a bullet, ammunition, or any other explosive device; tobacco products; intoxicating liquor; marijuana, amphetamines, or any other hallucinogenic drugs or other drugs, regardless of the amount; any telecommunications device; or any other article or item.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than four years.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 2/SB 366.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 3/SB 366, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.